Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LOCAL ROAD WETLAND REPLACEMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire land or permanent easements and to restore, create, enhance, and preserve wetlands to replace those wetlands drained or filled as a result of the repair, reconstruction, replacement, or rehabilitation of existing public roads as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.222, subdivision 1, paragraphs (l) and (m). The board may vary the priority order of Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.222, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), to implement an in-lieu fee agreement approved by the United States Army Corps of Engineers under section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act. The purchase price paid for acquisition of land or perpetual easement must be a fair market value as determined by the board. The board may enter into agreements with the federal government, other state agencies, political subdivisions, nonprofit organizations, fee title owners, or other qualified private entities to acquire wetland replacement credits in accordance with Minnesota Rules, chapter 8420. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $15,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end